Utah statutes.
78B-1-113.   Jury not selected in conformity with chapter -- Procedure to
challenge -- Relief available -- Exclusive remedy.
(1)  Within seven days after the moving party discovered, or by the exercise
of diligence could have discovered the grounds therefore, and in any event
before the trial jury is sworn to try the case, a party may move to stay the
proceedings or to quash an indictment, or for other appropriate relief, on the
ground of substantial failure to comply with this act in selecting a grand or
trial jury.
(2)  Upon motion filed under this section containing a sworn statement of acts
which if true would constitute a substantial failure to comply with this act,
the moving party may present testimony of  the county clerk, the clerk of the
court, any relevant records and papers not public or otherwise available used
by the jury commission or the clerk, and any other relevant evidence.  If the
court determines that in selecting either a grand or a trial jury there has
been a substantial failure to comply with this act and it appears that actual
and substantial injustice and prejudice has resulted or will result to a party
in consequence of the failure, the court shall stay the proceedings pending
the selection of the jury in conformity with this act, quash an indictment, or
grant other appropriate relief.
(3)  The procedures prescribed by this section are the exclusive means by
which a person accused of a crime, the state, or a party in a civil case may
challenge a jury on the ground that the jury was not selected in conformity
with this act.
